Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB270.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 337.275 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as may otherwise be provided by this chapter, every employer shall
pay to each of his or her employees wages at a rate of not less than:
1. Nine dollars and fifty cents ($9.50) an hour beginning on the effective
date of this Act;
2. Eleven dollars ($11) an hour beginning on July 1, 2027;
3. Twelve dollars and fifty cents ($12.50) an hour beginning on July 1,
2028;
4. Fourteen dollars ($14) an hour beginning on July 1, 2029; and
5. Fifteen dollars ($15) an hour beginning on July 1, 2030[five dollars
and eighty-five cents ($5.85) an hour beginning on June 26, 2007, not
less than six dollars and fifty-five cents ($6.55) an hour beginning July
1, 2008, and not less than seven dollars and twenty-five cents ($7.25) an
hour beginning July 1, 2009].
(b) If the federal minimum hourly wage as prescribed by 29 U.S.C. sec. 206(a)(1)
is increased in excess of the minimum hourly wage in effect under this
subsection, the minimum hourly wage under this subsection shall be increased
to the same amount, effective on the same date as the federal minimum hourly
wage rate. If the state minimum hourly wage is increased to the federal
minimum hourly wage, it shall include only the federal minimum hourly rate
prescribed in 29 U.S.C. sec. 206(a)(1) and shall not include other wage rates
or conditions, exclusions, or exceptions to the federal minimum hourly wage
rate. In addition, the increase to the federal minimum hourly wage rate does
not extend or modify the scope or coverage of the minimum wage rate
required under this chapter.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 11/20/2025 9:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 329
(2) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, for any
employee engaged in an occupation in which he or she customarily and
regularly receives more than thirty dollars ($30) per month in tips from
patrons or others, the employer may pay as a minimum not less than five
dollars ($5) an hour beginning on the effective date of this Act.
(b) If[ the hourly wage rate required to be paid a tipped employee under] the
federal minimum hourly wage[ law] as prescribed by 29 U.S.C. sec. 203 is
increased in excess of the minimum hourly wage in effect under this
subsection, the minimum hourly wage under this subsection shall be
increased to the same amount, effective on the same date as the federal
minimum hourly wage rate.
(c) The employer shall establish by his or her records that for each week where
credit is taken, when adding tips received to wages paid, not less than the
minimum rate prescribed in subsection (1) of this section[29 U.S.C. sec. 203]
was received by the employee. No employer shall use all or part of any tips or
gratuities received by employees toward the payment of the statutory
minimum hourly wage as required by subsection (1) of this section[29 U.S.C.
sec. 203]. Nothing, however, shall prevent employees from entering into an
agreement to divide tips or gratuities among themselves.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 11/20/2025 9:44 AM Jacketed